Vermont, session 2025-2026, H322.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. § 3202 is amended to read:
§ 3202. PROHIBITION; OFFENSES
(a) A person shall not practice or attempt to practice licensed independent
clinical social work or licensed master’s social work, nor shall any person use
in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia indicating
or implying that the person is a licensed independent clinical social worker or a
VT LEG #379505 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.322
2025 Page 2 of 3
licensed master’s social worker unless the person is licensed in accordance
with this chapter.
(b) A person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section shall be subject to the penalties provided in 3 V.S.A. § 127. Unless a
person has earned a bachelor’s, master’s, or doctoral degree from a social work
program accredited by the Council of Social Work Education or its successor,
the person shall not:
(1) use the title “social worker” or any initials associated with the title;
or
(2) advertise services under the description of “social worker.”
(c) A Neither a State agency or a subdivision or contractor thereof, nor a
private entity, shall not use or permit the use of the title “social worker” other
than in relation to an employee holding a bachelor’s, master’s, or doctoral
degree from an accredited school or program of a social work program
accredited by the Council of Social Work Education or its successor.
(d) A person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be
subject to the penalties provided in 3 V.S.A. § 127.
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. § 3205 is amended to read:
§ 3205. LICENSED MASTER’S SOCIAL WORKER ELIGIBILITY
To be eligible for licensing as a licensed master’s social worker, an
applicant must have:
VT LEG #379505 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.322
2025 Page 3 of 3
(1) received a master’s degree or doctoral degree from an accredited
social work education program a social work program accredited by the
Council of Social Work Education or its successor; and
(2) within five years prior to applying for licensure, passed the
examinations designated by the Director.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. § 3205a is amended to read:
§ 3205a. LICENSED INDEPENDENT CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER
ELIGIBILITY
(a) To be eligible for licensure as a licensed independent clinical social
worker, an applicant must have:
(1) received a master’s degree or doctoral degree from an accredited
social work education program a social work program accredited by the
Council of Social Work Education or its successor;
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379505 v.3